Utah statutes.
17-30-15.   Emergency appointment.

An emergency appointment may be made for a period not exceeding seven days, and with the consent of the commission may be extended one time for an additional period of not to exceed seven days, in the event an eligible person is not immediately available from the eligible, promotion, or re-employment register and the work to be performed is necessary to expedite the public business.

